Maryland, session 2026, SB0176.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Procedure
11–616.
(a) The Division or the Department of Juvenile Services:
(1) in addition to other actions authorized under Part I of this subtitle, may
refer an overdue restitution account for collection to the Central Collection Unit; and
(2) if probation or other supervision is terminated and restitution is still
owed, shall refer the overdue restitution account for collection to the Central Collection
Unit.
(b) Subject to subsection (c) of this section, the Central Collection Unit may:
(1) collect overdue restitution in accordance with Title 3, Subtitle 3 of the
State Finance and Procurement Article; and
(2) certify a restitution obligor who is in arrears on restitution payments
exceeding $30 under the judgment of restitution to:
(i) the Comptroller for income tax refund interception in accordance
with Title 13, Subtitle 9, Part III of the Tax – General Article; [and]
(ii) the State Lottery and Gaming Control Agency for State lottery
prize [and video lottery facility prize] payout interception in accordance with § 11–618 of
this subtitle; AND
(III) A VIDEO LOTTERY OPERATOR, AS DEFINED UNDER §
9–1A–01 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, FOR VIDEO LOTTERY FACILITY
PRIZE PAYOUT INTERCEPTION IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 11–618 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
11–618.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Agency” means the State Lottery and Gaming Control Agency.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 87
(3) “Video lottery facility” has the meaning stated in § 9–1A–01 of the State
Government Article.
(4) “Video lottery [operation licensee”] OPERATOR” has the meaning
stated in § 9–1A–01 of the State Government Article.
(b) A certification of arrearage on restitution payments that the Central
Collection Unit sends to the Agency OR A VIDEO LOTTERY OPERATOR under § 11–616 of
this subtitle shall contain:
(1) the full name of the restitution obligor and any other name known to be
used by the restitution obligor;
(2) the Social Security number of the restitution obligor; and
(3) the amount of the arrearage.
(d) If a restitution obligor who is overdue in restitution payments wins a prize at
a video lottery facility requiring the issuance of Internal Revenue Service form W–2G or a
substantially equivalent form by a video lottery [operation licensee] OPERATOR, the video
lottery [operation licensee] OPERATOR shall send a notice to NOTIFY the restitution
obligor that:
(1) the restitution obligor has won a prize to be paid by cash or check
directly by the video lottery [operation licensee] OPERATOR;
(2) the [State Lottery and Gaming Control Agency] VIDEO LOTTERY
OPERATOR has received notice from the Central Collection Unit of the restitution obligor’s
restitution arrearage in the amount specified;
(3) State law requires the video lottery [operation licensee] OPERATOR to
withhold the prize and pay it towards the restitution obligor’s restitution arrearage;
(4) the restitution obligor has 15 days to MAY appeal to the Central
Collection Unit if the restitution obligor disputes the existence or the amount of the
arrearage; and
(5) on interception of the prize IF AN APPEAL IS NOT FILED WITHIN 15
DAYS AFTER THE DATE OF THE NOTICE, the video lottery [operation licensee]
OPERATOR will transfer the prize or the part of the prize that equals the restitution
arrearage to the Central Collection Unit.
(e) (1) The Agency or the video lottery [operation licensee] OPERATOR shall:
– 3 –

Ch. 87 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(i) withhold and transfer all or part of the prize up to the amount of
the arrearage to the Central Collection Unit; and
(ii) pay the excess to the restitution obligor.
(2) The Agency and a video lottery [operation licensee] OPERATOR shall
honor interception requests in the following order:
(i) an interception request under § 10–113.1 of the Family Law
Article;
(ii) an interception request under this section; [and]
(iii) an interception request under § 3–307 of the State Finance and
Procurement Article; AND
(IV) AN INTERCEPTION REQUEST UNDER § 3–308 OF THE STATE
FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.
(f) (1) On receipt of a notice from the Agency or a video lottery [operation
licensee] OPERATOR, a restitution obligor who disputes the existence or amount of the
arrearage may appeal the transfer IN ACCORDANCE WITH TITLE 10, SUBTITLE 2 OF
THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
(2) If an appeal is not filed within 15 days after the date of the notice, the
Central Collection Unit may retain the withheld prize THE AGENCY OR VIDEO LOTTERY
OPERATOR SHALL TRANSFER THE AMOUNT OF THE PRIZE WITHHELD IN
ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (E)(2) OF THIS SECTION.
(3) If the restitution obligor appeals the transfer, after a hearing by the
Central Collection Unit IN ACCORDANCE WITH TITLE 10, SUBTITLE 2 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, the withheld prize shall be:
(i) paid to the restitution obligor;
(ii) retained by the Central Collection Unit PAID IN ACCORDANCE
WITH SUBSECTION (E)(2) OF THIS SECTION; or
(iii) partly paid to the restitution obligor and partly retained by the
Central Collection Unit PAID IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (E)(2) OF THIS
SECTION.
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 87
(h) A video lottery [operation licensee] OPERATOR may not be held liable for an
act or omission taken in good faith to comply substantially with the requirements of this
section.
Article – Family Law
10–113.1.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Agency” means the State Lottery and Gaming Control Agency.
(3) “Video lottery facility” has the meaning stated in § 9–1A–01 of the State
Government Article.
(4) “Video lottery [operation licensee”] OPERATOR” has the meaning
stated in § 9–1A–01 of the State Government Article.
(b) The Administration may certify to the Agency OR A VIDEO LOTTERY
OPERATOR the name of any obligor who is in arrears in the amount of $150 or more if:
(1) the Administration has accepted an assignment of support under §
5–312(b)(2) of the Human Services Article; or
(2) the recipient of support payments has filed an application for support
enforcement services with the Administration.
(e) If an obligor who owes child support and has been certified as an obligor wins
a prize at a video lottery facility requiring the issuance of Internal Revenue Service form
W–2G or a substantially equivalent form by a video lottery [operation licensee]
OPERATOR, the video lottery [operation licensee] OPERATOR shall provide a notice to
NOTIFY the obligor that:
(1) the obligor has won a prize to be paid by cash or check directly by the
video lottery [operation licensee] OPERATOR;
(2) the [State Lottery and Gaming Control Agency] VIDEO LOTTERY
OPERATOR has received certification from the Child Support Administration of the
obligor’s child support arrearage in the amount specified;
(3) State law requires the video lottery [operation licensee] OPERATOR to
withhold the prize and to pay it towards the obligor’s child support arrearage;
(4) the obligor has 15 days to MAY appeal to the Administration if the
obligor disputes the existence or the amount of the child support arrearage; and
– 5 –

Ch. 87 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(5) on interception of the prize IF AN APPEAL IS NOT FILED WITHIN 15
DAYS AFTER THE DATE OF THE NOTICE, the video lottery [operation licensee]
OPERATOR will transfer the prize or the part of the prize that equals the obligor’s child
support arrearage to the Administration.
(f) (1) The Agency or the video lottery [operation licensee] OPERATOR shall:
(i) withhold and transfer all or part of the prize up to the amount of
the arrearage to the Administration; and
(ii) pay the excess to the obligor.
(2) The Agency and a video lottery [operation licensee] OPERATOR shall
honor interception requests in the following order:
(i) an interception request under this section;
(ii) an interception request under § 11–618 of the Criminal
Procedure Article; [and]
(iii) an interception request under § 3–307 of the State Finance and
Procurement Article; AND
(IV) AN INTERCEPTION REQUEST UNDER § 3–308 OF THE STATE
FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.
(g) (1) On receipt of a notice from the Agency or video lottery [operation
licensee] OPERATOR, an obligor who disputes the existence or amount of the arrearage
may appeal the transfer.
(2) If no appeal is filed within 15 days, the Administration may retain the
withheld prize.
(3) If the obligor appeals the transfer, after a hearing by the
Administration, the withheld prize shall be:
(i) paid to the obligor;
(ii) retained by the Administration PAID IN ACCORDANCE WITH
SUBSECTION (F)(2) OF THIS SECTION; or
(iii) partly paid to the obligor and partly retained by the
Administration, in the amounts specified PAID IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION
(F)(2) OF THIS SECTION.
– 6 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 87
(i) A video lottery [operation licensee] OPERATOR may not be held liable for an
act or omission taken in good faith to comply substantially with the requirements of this
section.
Article – State Finance and Procurement
3–304.
(a) In carrying out its responsibilities, the Central Collection Unit may:
(1) (i) institute, in its name, any action that is available under State
law for collection of a debt or claim; or
(ii) without suit, settle the debt or claim;
(2) for all debts or claims collected on or after June 1, 1992:
(i) in addition to the outstanding principal and interest, assess and
collect from the debtor a fee, which may not exceed 20% of the outstanding principal and
interest, sufficient to cover all collection and administrative costs; and
(ii) prior to crediting any amount to any agency which refers a debt
for any purpose, withhold a fee sufficient to cover all collection and administrative costs;
(3) waive or reduce any fee assessed under paragraph (2) of this subsection;
and
(4) certify a debt or claim and the debtor responsible for the debt or claim
to:
(i) the Comptroller for income tax refund interception in accordance
with Title 13, Subtitle 9 of the Tax – General Article; [and]
(ii) the State Lottery and Gaming Control Agency for State lottery
prize interception in accordance with § 3–307 of this subtitle; AND
(III) A VIDEO LOTTERY OPERATOR, AS DEFINED IN § 9–1A–01 OF
THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, FOR PRIZE INTERCEPTION IN ACCORDANCE
WITH § 3–308 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
3–307.
(c) (2) The State Lottery and Gaming Control Agency shall honor lottery prize
interception requests in the following order:
– 7 –

Ch. 87 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(i) an interception request under § 10–113.1 of the Family Law
Article;
(ii) an interception request under § 11–618 of the Criminal
Procedure Article; [and]
(iii) an interception request under this section; AND
(IV) AN INTERCEPTION REQUEST UNDER § 3–308 OF THIS
SUBTITLE.
3–308.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “VIDEO LOTTERY OPERATOR” HAS THE MEANING
STATED IN § 9–1A–01 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
(B) CERTIFICATION OF A DEBT OR CLAIM OWED TO THE STATE THAT THE
CENTRAL COLLECTION UNIT SENDS TO THE VIDEO LOTTERY OPERATOR UNDER §
3–304(A)(4) OF THIS SUBTITLE SHALL CONTAIN:
(1) THE FULL NAME OF THE DEBTOR AND ANY OTHER NAME KNOWN
TO BE USED BY THE DEBTOR;
(2) THE SOCIAL SECURITY NUMBER OF THE DEBTOR; AND
(3) THE AMOUNT OF THE DEBT.
(C) IF A DEBTOR WINS A PRIZE TO BE PAID DIRECTLY BY A VIDEO LOTTERY
OPERATOR REQUIRING THE ISSUANCE OF INTERNAL REVENUE SERVICE FORM
W–2G OR A SUBSTANTIALLY EQUIVALENT FORM BY THE VIDEO LOTTERY
OPERATOR, THE VIDEO LOTTERY OPERATOR SHALL NOTIFY THE DEBTOR THAT:
(1) THE DEBTOR HAS WON A PRIZE TO BE PAID BY THE VIDEO
LOTTERY OPERATOR;
(2) THE VIDEO LOTTERY OPERATOR HAS RECEIVED NOTICE FROM
THE CENTRAL COLLECTION UNIT OF THE DEBTOR’S DEBT OR CLAIM OWED TO THE
STATE IN THE SPECIFIED AMOUNT;
(3) STATE LAW REQUIRES THE VIDEO LOTTERY OPERATOR TO
WITHHOLD THE PRIZE AND TO PAY IT TOWARD THE DEBTOR’S DEBT OR CLAIM;
– 8 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 87
(4) THE DEBTOR MAY APPEAL TO THE CENTRAL COLLECTION UNIT
IF THE DEBTOR DISPUTES THE EXISTENCE OR THE AMOUNT OF THE DEBT OR CLAIM;
AND
(5) IF AN APPEAL IS NOT FILED WITHIN 15 DAYS AFTER THE DATE OF
THE NOTICE, THE VIDEO LOTTERY OPERATOR WILL TRANSFER THE PRIZE OR THE
PART OF THE PRIZE THAT EQUALS THE AMOUNT OF THE DEBT OR CLAIM TO THE
CENTRAL COLLECTION UNIT.
(D) (1) THE VIDEO LOTTERY OPERATOR SHALL WITHHOLD ALL OR PART
OF THE PRIZE UP TO THE AMOUNT OF THE DEBT OR CLAIM OWED TO THE STATE.
(2) THE VIDEO LOTTERY OPERATOR SHALL HONOR PRIZE
INTERCEPTION REQUESTS IN THE FOLLOWING ORDER:
(I) AN INTERCEPTION REQUEST UNDER § 10–113.1 OF THE
FAMILY LAW ARTICLE;
(II) AN INTERCEPTION REQUEST UNDER § 11–618 OF THE
CRIMINAL PROCEDURE ARTICLE; AND
(III) AN INTERCEPTION REQUEST UNDER § 3–307 OF THIS
SUBTITLE; AND
(IV) AN INTERCEPTION REQUEST UNDER THIS SECTION.
(E) (1) ON RECEIPT OF A NOTICE FROM THE VIDEO LOTTERY OPERATOR,
A DEBTOR WHO DISPUTES THE EXISTENCE OR AMOUNT OF THE DEBT OR CLAIM MAY
APPEAL THE PROPOSED TRANSFER IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE PROVISIONS OF THE
ADMINISTRATIVE PROCEDURE ACT, TITLE 10, SUBTITLE 2 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
(2) IF AN APPEAL IS NOT FILED WITHIN 15 DAYS AFTER THE DATE OF
THE NOTICE, THE VIDEO LOTTERY OPERATOR SHALL TRANSFER THE AMOUNT OF
THE PRIZE WITHHELD TO THE CENTRAL COLLECTION UNIT.
(3) IF THE DEBTOR APPEALS THE PROPOSED TRANSFER, AFTER A
HEARING HELD IN ACCORDANCE WITH TITLE 10, SUBTITLE 2 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, THE CENTRAL COLLECTION UNIT SHALL NOTIFY THE
VIDEO LOTTERY OPERATOR THAT THE WITHHELD PRIZE SHALL BE:
(I) PAID TO THE DEBTOR;
– 9 –

Ch. 87 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(II) TRANSFERRED TO THE CENTRAL COLLECTION UNIT; OR
(III) IN SPECIFIED AMOUNTS, PARTLY PAID TO THE DEBTOR AND
PARTLY TRANSFERRED TO THE CENTRAL COLLECTION UNIT.
(F) THE SECRETARY AND THE DIRECTOR OF THE STATE LOTTERY AND
GAMING CONTROL AGENCY MAY JOINTLY ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT
THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, April 14, 2026.
– 10 –